New Jersey, session 222, S3682.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Human Services, in consultation with the Commissioners of Corrections and Health, the Executive Director of the Youth Justice Commission, and the Chairman of the State Parole Board shall establish and maintain on a 24-hour daily basis a prisoner reentry support toll-free telephone hotline service, operating through one of the existing telephone hotline services of the department.  The hotline shall receive and respond to calls from formerly incarcerated persons who seek support in reentry following release from custody. b.    The operators of the hotline shall be peer recovery specialists, certified by the Addiction Professionals Certification Board of New Jersey, or peer recovery support specialists, certified by the Association for Addiction Professionals. The operators shall receive any further training as determined to be necessary by the Commissioner of Human Services to carry out the purpose set forth in subsection a. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.